Massachusetts, session 194th, H1682.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 265 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 13O. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following term shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meaning:
"Sports official", any individual who serves as a paid or volunteer referee, umpire or line
judge, or who serves in similar capacity but may be known by a different title or name.
(b) If a person: (i) commits an assault or an assault and battery on a sports official
immediately prior to, during or immediately following an interscholastic, intercollegiate or any
other organized amateur or professional athletic contest in which the sports official is
participating; and (ii) knows or reasonably should know that the sports official engaged in the
of 2

performance of their duties, the person shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500 and not
more than $5,000, or by imprisonment in a house of correction for not less than 90 days and not
more than 21/2 years, or both.
(c) No person shall require a sports official to remain on the playing surface of an athletic
contest after the expiration of any interscholastic, intercollegiate or any other organized amateur
or sporting contest. Whoever violates the provisions of this subsection shall be punished by a
fine of not more than $200 or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days.
of 2